Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 29A Juries

29A.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Court” means a Circuit or District Court of this Commonwealth and includes any judge of these courts.

“Name” includes an identifying number.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 12, effective September 1, 1977; 2002, ch. 252, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

29A.020.
Procedural rules.

The Supreme Court may make and amend such procedural rules as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 13, effective September 1, 1977.

29A.030.
Jury commissioners — Qualifications — Compensation — Term — Duties. [Repealed.]

29A.040.
Master list of prospective jurors for county — Annual update.

A list of all persons over the age of eighteen (18) and holding personal identification cards under KRS

186.4122

or valid driver’s licenses which were issued in the county, of the names and addresses of all persons filing Kentucky resident individual income tax returns which show an address in the county, and of all persons registered to vote in the county shall constitute a master list of prospective jurors for a county.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall at least annually acquire an electronic copy of the list of personal identification cards issued under KRS

186.4122

and the driver’s license list from the Transportation Cabinet, an electronic copy of the tax roll described in subsection (1) of this section from the Department of Revenue, and an electronic copy of the voter registration lists from the State Board of Elections. In addition, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall at least annually acquire a listing of deceased persons from the Vital Statistics Branch in the Department of Public Health. The Transportation Cabinet, the Department of Revenue, the State Board of Elections, and the Vital Statistics Branch and those public officers or employees having custody, possession, or control of any of the lists required under this section shall annually furnish a copy of the list to the Administrative Office of the Courts without charge.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall merge the lists required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section in a manner designed to create an accurate listing of all persons eligible for jury service. The Administrative Office of the Courts may purge names from the master list upon reasonable evidence of death, change of state residence, change of county residence, or any other reason causing a person to be ineligible for jury service as found in KRS

29A.080

.

Any person who comes into possession of the Kentucky income tax names and addresses as provided in this section shall be bound by the confidentiality provisions of KRS

131.190

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 15, effective September 1, 1977; 1982, ch. 449, § 6, effective October 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 250, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 252, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 44, effective June 20, 2005; 2020 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

29A.050.
Selection of names of prospective jurors by jury commission. [Repealed.]

29A.060.
Assignment of jurors by Chief Circuit Judge — Service of summons — Selection of additional jurors — Summonsing jurors from adjoining counties.

Each Circuit or District Judge shall inform the Chief Circuit Judge or the Chief Circuit Judge’s designee of the need for qualified jurors.

The Chief Circuit Judge or designee shall regulate the random assignment of jurors for use in Circuit and District Courts. Any petit juror assigned to a judge of Circuit or District Court may be used by any other judge of any other branch or division of Circuit or District Court when jurors are needed.

If a grand, petit, or other jury is ordered to be drawn, the Chief Circuit Judge or designee thereafter shall cause each person drawn for jury service to be served with a summons requiring that person to report for jury service at a specified time and place, unless otherwise notified by the court, and to be available for jury service for thirty (30) judicial days thereafter. The service of summons shall be made by the court utilizing first class mail, addressed to each person at his or her usual residence, business, or post office address. In the event service cannot be accomplished by first class mail, the court may cause service to be made personally by the sheriff. In either case, notice shall be mailed or served to the prospective juror at least thirty (30) days before he or she is required to attend.

The juror qualification form required by KRS

29A.070

shall be enclosed with the summons. If the summons is served by mail, any prospective juror who does not return the juror qualification form within ten (10) days may be personally served by the sheriff at the discretion of the Chief Circuit Judge or Chief Circuit Judge’s designee.

When there is an unanticipated shortage of available jurors obtained from a randomized jury list, the Chief Circuit Judge may cause to be summonsed a sufficient number of jurors selected sequentially from the randomized jury list beginning with the first name following the last name previously selected. The persons so chosen shall be summonsed as provided in this section, but need not be given the notice provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Only persons duly qualified and summonsed under subsection (3) of this section and KRS

29A.070

shall serve as jurors.

If, after making a fair effort in good faith, the judge is satisfied that it will be impracticable to obtain a jury free of bias in the county in which the prosecution is pending, the judge may obtain a sufficient number of jurors from some adjoining county in which the judge believes there is the greatest probability of obtaining impartial jurors. The judge shall request the Chief Circuit Judge for the adjoining county to draw and summon as many jurors as are needed. Jurors summonsed under this subsection need not be given the notice provided in subsection (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 17, effective September 1, 1977; 1980, ch. 114, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 449, § 7, effective October 1, 1982; 2002, ch. 252, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

29A.070.
Juror qualification forms.

The Chief Circuit Judge shall cause to be mailed or delivered with the summons to each juror a juror qualification form accompanied by instructions to fill out and return the form by mail or hand delivery to the clerk within five (5) days after its receipt, or to be completed as otherwise directed. The juror qualification form shall be provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts and subject to approval by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.

The juror qualification form shall contain the prospective juror’s signed declaration that his responses are true to the best of his knowledge and his acknowledgment that a willful misrepresentation of a material fact may be punished by a fine or by imprisonment, or both. Notarization of the juror qualification form shall not be required.

If the prospective juror is unable to fill out the form, another person may do it for him and shall indicate that he has done so and the reason therefor.

Any prospective juror who fails to return a properly completed juror qualification form as instructed may be directed by the Chief Circuit Judge to appear forthwith to fill out a juror qualification form. At the time of his appearance for jury service, any prospective juror may be questioned by the judge or his designee, but only with regard to his responses to questions contained on the form and grounds for his excuse or disqualification. Any information thus acquired shall be noted on the juror qualification form.

A prospective juror who fails to appear as directed by the judge pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall be ordered to appear and show cause for his failure to appear as directed. If the prospective juror fails to appear pursuant to the judge’s order or fails to show good cause for his failure to appear as directed by the judge, he may be punished for contempt.

No person shall willfully misrepresent a material fact on a juror qualification form.

The contents of juror qualification forms shall be made available to parties or their attorneys of record unless the court determines in any instance in the interest of justice that this information shall be kept confidential or its use limited in whole or in part.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 18, effective September 1, 1977.

29A.080.
Disqualifications for jury service — Permanent exemption.

The Chief Circuit Judge or one (1) or more judges of the court, the court’s clerk, a deputy clerk, the court’s administrator, or a deputy court administrator so designated by the Chief Circuit Judge shall determine on the basis of the information provided on the juror qualification form whether the prospective juror is disqualified for jury service for any of the reasons listed in subsection (2) of this section. This determination shall be entered in the space provided on the juror qualification form. The Chief Circuit Judge shall cause each disqualified juror to be immediately notified of the juror’s disqualification.

A prospective juror is disqualified to serve on a jury if the juror:

Is under eighteen (18) years of age;

Is not a citizen of the United States;

Is not a resident of the county;

Has insufficient knowledge of the English language;

Has been previously convicted of a felony and has not been pardoned or received a restoration of civil rights by the Governor or other authorized person of the jurisdiction in which the person was convicted;

Is presently under indictment; or

Has served on a jury within the time limitations set out under KRS

29A.130

.

The Chief Circuit Judge may grant a permanent exemption based upon an individual’s request and a finding by the Chief Circuit Judge of a permanent medical condition rendering the individual incapable of serving. The judge granting the permanent exemption shall notify the requesting person and the Administrative Office of the Courts. Upon receiving notification of a permanent exemption the Administrative Office of the Courts shall remove the person’s name from the master list.

There shall be no waiver of these disqualifications, except that pursuant to the Federal Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, an individual with a disability shall not be disqualified solely by reason of the disability. For the purposes of this section, “individual with a disability” means a person with a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more of the major life activities of the individual, a record of the impairment, or being regarded as having the impairment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 19, effective September 1, 1977; 1982, ch. 449, § 8, effective October 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 416, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 252, § 4, effective July 15, 2002.

29A.090.
Automatic exemptions prohibited.

There shall be no automatic exemptions from jury service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 20, effective September 1, 1977.

29A.100.
Postponement of service or excusing of juror — Breastfeeding mothers to be excused.

Upon the request of a prospective juror prior to assignment to a trial court, the Chief Circuit Judge, or after the juror’s assignment to a trial court, the trial judge may excuse such juror upon a showing of undue hardship, extreme inconvenience, or public necessity. On the day on which the prospective jurors are summonsed to appear, any person not previously excused who desires to be excused shall be heard.

The Chief Circuit Judge may designate and authorize one (1) or more judges of the court, the court’s clerk, a deputy clerk, the court’s administrator, or a deputy court administrator to excuse a juror from service for a period not to exceed ten (10) days or to postpone jury service for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months. The reasons for excuse or postponement shall be entered in the space provided on the juror qualification form.

In his or her discretion the judge may excuse a juror from service entirely, reduce the number of days of service, or may postpone the juror’s service temporarily for a period of time not to exceed, however, twenty-four (24) months. Whenever possible the judge shall favor temporary postponement of service or reduced service over permanent excuse. When excusing a juror, the judge shall record the juror’s name, as provided in KRS

29A.080

, and the reasons for granting the excuse.

The judge shall excuse a mother who is breastfeeding a child or expressing breastmilk from jury service until such time as the child is old enough that the mother is no longer breastfeeding the child.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 21, effective January 2, 1978; 2002, ch. 252, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 102, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

29A.110.
Disclosure of records or papers used in selection process.

The contents of any records or papers used by the Administrative Office of the Courts or the clerk in connection with the selection process and not required to be made public under this chapter shall not be disclosed, except in connection with the preparation or presentation of a motion under the Rules of Civil Procedure or the Rules of Criminal Procedure or upon order of the Chief Justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 22, effective January 2, 1978; 2002, ch. 252, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.

29A.120.
Preservation of records and papers compiled in selection process. [Repealed.]

29A.130.
Limitation on jury service within a twenty-four-month period.

Except as set out in this section, in any twenty-four (24) month period, a person shall not be required to:

Serve or attend court for prospective service as a petit juror more than thirty (30) court days except when necessary to complete service in a particular case; or

Serve on more than one (1) grand jury; or

Serve as both a grand and petit juror.

For the purpose of this section, court includes all federal courts, all other state courts, and any court of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 24, effective January 2, 1978; 2002, ch. 252, § 7, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(8/24/2005). In 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 252, sec. 7, the following text was erroneously included in this statute: “At any time for cause shown, the court may excuse a grand juror either temporarily or permanently and may swear another grand juror from a current jury panel in place of the one excused.
The discharge of any such grand juror shall in no way or manner affect any indictment found by the grand jury as it was composed either before or after such discharge. If it is impossible to fill the vacancy on the grand jury from a current jury panel, the Chief Circuit Judge may summon, using the procedure in KRS 29A.060(5), such number of prospective jurors as deemed necessary for the purpose.”

This text was not part of the statute when the section was created in 1976, and it was never added to the statute in accordance with the requirements of KRS 446.145(1). Instead, the text was inadvertently inserted, without underlining, in the 2002 amendment to this statute (2002 Ky. Acts ch. 252, sec. 7).

Acting under the authority of KRS

446.270

,

446.280

, and 7.136(1)(h), the Reviser of Statutes has deleted this extraneous text.

For a provision similar to the one deleted from this statute, see KRS

29A.260

.

29A.140.
Discharge of juror.

At the conclusion of his period of service as required by this chapter, each juror shall be discharged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 25, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.150.
Contempt — Failure to perform jury service.

A person summoned for jury service who fails to appear as directed shall be ordered by the court to appear forthwith and show cause for his failure to comply with the summons. If he fails to show good cause for noncompliance with the summons, he may be punished for contempt.

A juror who fails to give attention at court, or who leaves the courthouse while the court is in session, or who otherwise fails to complete jury service, without leave of the court, may be punished for contempt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 26, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.160.
Employer’s duties.

An employer shall not deprive an employee of his employment, or threaten or otherwise coerce him with respect thereto, because the employee receives a summons, responds thereto, serves as a juror, or attends court for prospective jury service.

If an employer discharges an employee in violation of subsection (1) of this section, the employee may within ninety (90) days of such discharge bring a civil action for recovery of wages lost as a result of the violation and for an order requiring the reinstatement of the employee with full seniority and benefits. Damages recoverable shall not exceed lost wages. If he prevails, the employee shall be allowed a reasonable attorney’s fee fixed by the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 27(1)(3).

29A.170.
Compensation of jurors.

All jurors in Circuit and District Court shall be paid five dollars ($5) per day for jury service. In addition thereto, they shall be paid seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per day as reimbursement of expenses incurred, which sum is hereby determined to be the equivalent of the minimum daily expenses reasonably to be incurred by such juror.

Persons who appear in court in response to a summons for jury duty and who are not relieved from jury service shall receive full compensation for each day they are required to be and are in attendance, even though they are not sworn or accepted for jury service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 28, effective January 2, 1978.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, F, 5, (3) at 1669.

29A.180.
Responsibility for needs of jurors, transportation to view scene, security personnel, equipment, and services.

The sheriff or city police, as appropriate, shall be responsible for meals, housing, and other incidental needs of grand jurors and petit jurors in Circuit Court and in District Court when the jurors are kept overnight or otherwise sequestered when ordered to do so by the judge of the court for which the jurors were summoned. The expenses for these services shall be borne by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the officer shall be reimbursed in accordance with administrative regulations issued by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

The sheriff or city police, as appropriate, shall be responsible for the transportation of jurors and other authorized persons to views of the scene or other locations authorized by the court pursuant to KRS

29A.310

. In criminal cases the expenses for these services shall be borne by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the sheriff shall be reimbursed in accordance with administrative regulations issued by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. Excepting views conducted under the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, in civil cases these expenses shall be paid by the party requesting the viewing.

The sheriff or city police, as appropriate, shall be responsible for providing any specialized security personnel, equipment, and services which the judge, with the consent of the Chief Justice, shall deem necessary for the conduct of a trial in which the judge believes that special security precautions are necessary or desirable. The expenses for these services shall be borne by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the officer shall be reimbursed in accordance with administrative regulations issued by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. In such cases, the judge may also request the Chief Justice to provide the services of the Department of Kentucky State Police to ensure proper security precautions relating to the case.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 29, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 338, § 1, effective March 30, 1978; 1994, ch. 508, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 114, effective June 26, 2007; 2019 ch. 44, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

29A.190.
Adjournment of juries.

The court may adjourn the whole or part of the petit jury to any day of their required periods of service, but they shall not be paid for the time they stand adjourned. The grand jury may be adjourned in like manner without pay.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 30, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.200.
Number of grand jurors — Number required to find indictment.

A grand jury shall consist of twelve (12) persons, nine (9) of whom concurring may find an indictment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 31, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.210.
Summoning and convening of regular grand juries — Sessions.

A regular grand jury shall be summoned upon the order of the Chief Circuit Judge. The grand jury shall be convened at least once every four (4) months at such time as may be designated by the Circuit Court. The court may require the grand jury to convene more often if the ends of justice or the needs of the county so require. The court may require the grand jury to convene if the Commonwealth’s or county attorney certifies to the court that there are defendants who have been bound over to the grand jury and that there is a need for the grand jury to consider the return of any indictments.

The Chief Justice may authorize any Chief Circuit Judge to impanel an additional regular grand jury upon a showing that a single grand jury cannot handle the volume of business before the court.

A regular grand jury shall remain in session until discharged by the court but shall not remain in session longer than twenty (20) days of actual court attendance except when necessary to complete work on a single case in which testimony has already been taken.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 32, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.220.
Special grand juries — Sessions — Extension of sessions.

Any Chief Circuit Judge may summon for cause a special grand jury to deal with a situation requiring lengthy investigation which cannot be adequately handled during the term of the regular grand jury.

A special grand jury shall remain in session until discharged by the court, but shall not remain in session longer than ninety (90) days, provided, however, that a special grand jury may be extended for additional ninety (90) day periods on the written order of the Chief Circuit Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 33, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.230.
Release of juror from grand jury service and retention as petit juror.

If a juror selected is incapable of serving as a grand juror but capable of serving as a petit juror, the judge may, for good cause shown, release the juror from grand jury service and retain him as a petit juror.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 34, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.240.
Oath to grand jury.

The court shall swear the grand jury using substantially the following oath: “Do you swear or affirm that you will hear and weigh carefully all the evidence presented to you, and that you will do your duty as prescribed by law, and that you will carry out carefully any investigations which you are requested to make?”

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 35, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 9, effective October 1, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Oath to Grand Jury, Form 11.07.

29A.250.
Foreman of grand jury — Oath to witnesses.

The grand jurors shall elect one (1) of their members to be foreman. The foreman shall administer an oath to each witness who testifies before the grand jury, substantially as follows: “Do you swear or affirm that you will tell the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth?”.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 36, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 10, effective October 1, 1982.

29A.260.
Replacement of grand juror who is excused.

At any time for cause shown, the court may excuse a grand juror either temporarily or permanently and may swear another grand juror from a current jury panel in place of the one excused. The discharge of any such grand juror shall in no way or manner affect any indictment found by the grand jury as it was composed either before or after such discharge. If it is impossible to fill the vacancy on the grand jury from a current jury panel, the Chief Circuit Judge may summon, using the procedure in KRS 29A.060(5), such number of prospective jurors as deemed necessary for the purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 37, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 11, effective October 1, 1982; 2002, ch. 252, § 8, effective July 15, 2002.

29A.270.
Right to jury trial.

Defendants shall have the right to a jury trial in all criminal prosecutions, including prosecutions for violations of traffic laws, in the Circuit and District Courts. The defendant may request a jury trial at any time prior to the time his case is called for trial.

There shall be no right to a jury trial in civil actions in which the amount in controversy does not exceed two hundred and fifty dollars ($250).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the power of the judge to punish for contempt of court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 38, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 289, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

29A.280.
Number of jurors in Circuit and District Courts — Number required for verdict.

Juries for all trials in Circuit Court shall be composed of twelve (12) persons. Juries for all trials in District Court shall be composed of six (6) persons.

In Circuit Court, at any time before the jury is sworn, the parties with the approval of the court may stipulate that the jury shall consist of any number less than twelve (12), except that no jury shall consist of less than six (6) persons.

A unanimous verdict is required in all criminal trials by jury. The agreement of at least three-fourths (3/4) of the jurors is required for a verdict in all civil trials by jury in Circuit Court. The agreement of at least five-sixths (5/6) of the jurors is required for a verdict in all civil trials by jury in District Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 39, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.290.
Examination of petit jurors — Challenges — Alternate jurors.

The voir dire examination of petit jurors shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Supreme Court.

The parties shall have the right to challenge jurors as follows:

There shall be an unlimited right to challenge jurors for cause; and

The number of peremptory challenges shall be prescribed by the Supreme Court.

The judge may select alternate jurors. The procedures for the use of alternate jurors shall be prescribed by the Supreme Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 40, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.300.
Oath to petit jury.

The court shall swear the petit jurors using substantially the following oath: “Do you swear or affirm that you will impartially try the case between the parties and give a true verdict according to the evidence and the law, unless dismissed by the court?”.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 41, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 12, effective October 1, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Oath to Petit Jury, Form 11.06.

ALR

Officer, member of petit jury as, within constitutional or statutory provision in relation to oath or affirmation. 118 A.L.R. 1098.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to jurors. 18 A.L.R.2d 294.

29A.310.
Admonition to jury upon separation — View of property or place.

If the jury is permitted to separate, either during the trial or after the case is submitted to them, they shall be admonished by the court that it is their duty not to converse with, nor allow themselves to be addressed by, any other person on any subject of the trial; and that, during the trial, it is their duty not to form or express an opinion thereon, until the case is finally submitted to them.

No officer, party, or witness to an action pending, or his attorney or attorneys shall, without leave of the court, converse with the jury or any member thereof upon any subject after they have been sworn.

When necessary the judge may authorize the jury to view the real property which is the subject of the litigation, or the place in which any material fact occurred, or the place in which the offense is charged to have been committed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 42, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.320.
Duty of jury and officer after submission — Causes for discharge of jury — Procedure for rendering verdict.

When the case is finally submitted to the jury, they shall retire for deliberation. When they retire, they shall be kept together in some convenient place, under the charge of an officer, until they agree upon a verdict or are discharged by the court, subject to the Supreme Court rules permitting them to separate temporarily at night and for their meals. The officer having them under his charge shall not allow any communications to be made to them, nor make any himself, except to ask them if they have agreed upon their verdict, unless by order of the court; and he shall not, before their verdict is rendered, communicate to any person the state of their deliberations, or the verdict agreed upon.

The jury may be discharged by the court on account of the sickness of a juror, or other accident, calamity or circumstance requiring their discharge; or, by consent of both parties; or, after they have been kept together until it satisfactorily appears that there is no probability of their agreeing.

Cases in which the jury are discharged without making a verdict shall be tried again at such time as the court may direct.

The procedure for rendering the verdict shall be:

When the jury have agreed on their verdict, the verdict shall be written and signed by the foreman.

When a verdict is rendered by less than the whole jury, it shall be signed by all the jurors who agree to it.

The foreman shall hand the verdict to the judge who shall read the verdict and then make inquiry of the jury as to whether it is their verdict.

When the verdict is announced either party may require that the jury be polled, which is done by the judge asking each juror if it is his verdict.

If more than the number of jurors required by KRS

29A.280

, as appropriate to the type of case being tried, answers in the negative, the jury must be sent out for further deliberation.

If no disagreement is expressed or, in an appropriate case, an insufficient number disagree, the verdict is complete and the jury shall be discharged from the case.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 43, effective January 2, 1978.

29A.330.
Jury fee.

The jury fee for a civil trial in Circuit Court and District Court shall be set in accordance with KRS

48.195

.

The jury fee shall be assessed as costs against the unsuccessful party upon judgment or dismissal of the action.

If two (2) or more cases are consolidated by order of the court and tried together, the clerk shall collect only one (1) jury fee.

If a plaintiff sues in forma pauperis, he or she shall not be liable for a jury fee.

If a request for a jury trial is withdrawn or the case is disposed of not less than two (2) court days prior to the date set for trial the clerk shall not assess the jury fee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 44, effective January 2, 1978; 2002, ch. 252, § 9, effective July 15, 2002.

29A.990.
Penalties.

Any employer who violates subsection (1) or (2) of KRS

29A.160

is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any willful violation of KRS

29A.010

to

29A.330

for which a penalty is not otherwise provided by statute shall be punishable as a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, §§ 27(2), 45; 2002, ch. 252, § 10, effective July 15, 2002.